Massachusetts, session 194th, S1042.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or General law to the contrary:
If a petition for civil commitment of a patient defined by Massachusetts General Law Ch.
123, Section 35 is made while the individual is in a hospital setting, the individual and their
independent counsel may participate in the subsequent court hearing remotely; a court ordered
evaluation pursuant to this section may be performed remotely; and no discharge of a patient
who has suffered an overdose or who required the administration of an opioid antagonist shall be
discharged from a medical facility until an evaluation by a licensed social worker has taken place
and a meeting with a recovery coach and navigator has taken place; the discharge of a patient
from a public health facility licensed under said section shall not be granted unless approved by
the judge who issued the order for civil commitment;
of 1